Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5021XS (6) 91 ss/ns S.F. 2037 Section 1. Section 2.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 2. Departments and agencies of state government shall, 3 at least forty-five sixty days prior to the convening of 4 each session of the general assembly, submit copies to the 5 legislative services agency of proposed legislative bills and 6 joint resolutions which that such departments and agencies 7 desire to be considered by the general assembly. The proposed 8 legislative bills and joint resolutions of the governor must be 9 submitted by the Friday prior to the convening of the session 10 of the general assembly, except in the year of the governorâs 11 initial inauguration. The legislative services agency shall 12 review such proposals and submit them in proper form to the 13 presiding officer in each house of the general assembly for 14 referral to the proper standing committee. Before submitting 15 any proposal prepared under this section to the presiding 16 officers, the legislative services agency shall return it for 17 review to, as appropriate, the relevant department or agency 18 or the governorâs office and such department or agency or the 19 governorâs office shall review and return it within seven days 20 of such delivery. 21